Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.040

Powers and duties.

The authority is authorized and empowered to do the following, on such terms, with such security and undertakings, subject to such conditions, and in return for such consideration, as the authority shall determine in its discretion to be necessary, useful, or convenient in accomplishing the purposes of this chapter:

(1) To promulgate rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;

(2) To adopt an official seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

(3) To maintain an office at any place or places as the authority may designate;

(4) To sue and be sued in its own name, and to plead and be impleaded;

(5) To make and execute agreements with participants and others and all other instruments necessary, useful, or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter;

(6) To provide long-term or short-term financing or refinancing to participants for project costs, by way of loan, lease, conditional sales contract, mortgage, option to purchase, or other financing or security device or any such combination;

(7) If, in order to provide to participants the financing or refinancing of project costs described in subsection (6) of this section, the authority deems it necessary or convenient for it to own a project or projects or any part of a project or projects, for any period of time, it may acquire, contract, improve, alter, rehabilitate, repair, manage, operate, mortgage, subject to a security interest, lease, sell, or convey the project;

(8) To fix, revise from time to time, and charge and collect from participants and others rates, rents, fees, charges, and repayments as necessary to fully and timely reimburse the authority for all expenses incurred by it in providing the financing and refinancing and other services under this section and for the repayment, when due, of all the principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on all bonds issued under this chapter to provide the financing, refinancing, and services;

(9) To accept and receive funds, grants, gifts, pledges, guarantees, mortgages, trust deeds, and other security instruments, and property from the federal government or the state or other public body, entity, or agency and from any public or private institution, association, corporation, or organization, including participants. It shall not accept or receive from the state or any taxing agency any money derived from taxes, except money to be devoted to the purposes of a project of the state or of a taxing agency;

(10) To open and maintain a bank account or accounts in one or more qualified public depositories in this state and to deposit all or any part of authority funds therein;

(11) To employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, an executive director, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to fix their compensation;

(12) To provide financing or refinancing to two or more participants for a single project or for several projects in such combinations as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient;

(13) To charge to and equitably apportion among participants the administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this chapter;

(14) To consult with the student achievement council to determine project priorities under the purposes of this chapter;

(15) Provide for the investment of any funds, including funds held in reserve, not required for immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments; and

(16) To do all other things necessary, useful, or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

In the exercise of any of these powers, the authority shall incur no expense or liability which shall be an obligation, either general or special, of the state, or a general obligation of the authority, and shall pay no expense or liability from funds other than funds of the authority. Funds of the state shall not be used for such purpose.

[ 2016 c 152 s 8; 2012 c 229 s 508; 1985 c 370 s 49; 1983 c 169 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.